Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB286.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER
154 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Office" means the Office of Entrepreneurship and Innovation;
(b) "Secretary" means the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development;
(c) "Veteran" means any person who:
1. Served in the United States Armed Forces, Reserves, or National
Guard and was separated or released therefrom with an honorable
discharge, discharge under honorable conditions, or general
discharge under honorable conditions; or
2. Currently serves in the United States Armed Forces, Reserves, or
National Guard; and
(d) "Veteran entrepreneurs" means veterans who start or own one (1) or more
small businesses.
(2) The Veteran Entrepreneur Program is established within the Office of
Entrepreneurship and Innovation to provide assistance to veteran entrepreneurs
in the Commonwealth.
(3) The Veteran Entrepreneur Program shall provide assistance to veteran
entrepreneurs by:
(a) Performing outreach functions to improve veteran entrepreneurs'
awareness of available federal and state benefits and services;
(b) Assessing the need for benefits and services among veteran entrepreneurs;
(c) Reviewing and researching programs, projects, and initiatives designed to
address the needs of veteran entrepreneurs and collaborating with federal,
state, and private agencies that provide services to veteran entrepreneurs to
Page 1 of 6
XXXX 11/6/2025 9:08 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 103
allow veterans to make use of those services;
(d) Evaluating semiannually the effectiveness of the office's efforts to assist
veteran entrepreneurs and making appropriate recommendations to the
executive director of the office to improve services and assistance provided
to those veterans; and
(e) Providing information about opportunities for veteran entrepreneurs in the
office's collaborative network of businesses and organizations.
(4) The secretary shall appoint a program coordinator to administer the program and
provide facilities as appropriate in support of the program to the extent funding is
available for that purpose.
(5) The office may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to effectuate this section.
(6) The program shall consult with the United States Department of Veterans Affairs
and the United States Small Business Administration in developing procedures
under this section to ensure the services provided by this program do not
duplicate services provided through the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs or the United States Small Business Administration.
(7) The office shall establish any additional qualifications necessary for applicants of
the program.
Section 2. KRS 154.12-277 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is created in the Cabinet for Economic Development the Office of
Entrepreneurship and Innovation. The office shall be headed by an executive
director appointed by the secretary pursuant to KRS 154.10-050. The office shall be
responsible for various forms of entrepreneurship and innovation assistance,
including but not limited to providing customer service and project management
services to[with] small, [and ]minority, and veteran entrepreneur-owned
businesses, assisting export development, administering the innovation assistance
Page 2 of 6
XXXX 11/6/2025 9:08 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 103
set forth in KRS 154.12-278, introducing entrepreneurs to individual investors and
to investment capital firms interested in start-up and early-stage financing, and
collecting, summarizing, and disseminating information helpful to businesses,
including information on market research, federal, state, and local minority business
programs, government procurement opportunities, and the availability of
managerial assistance.
(2) The office shall include the Commission on Small Business Innovation and
Advocacy established in KRS 11.200.
Section 3. KRS 154.12-278 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "cluster" and "knowledge-based"[ shall] have the same
meaning as in KRS 164.6011.
(2) The Office of Entrepreneurship and Innovation shall:
(a) Implement the Kentucky Innovation and Commercialization Center Program
as set forth in KRS 154.12-300 to 154.12-310;
(b) Implement and support the Veteran Entrepreneur Program as set forth in
Section 1 of this Act;
(c) Monitor the return on investments and effectiveness of the Kentucky
Innovation Act initiatives as set forth in the Strategic Plan for the New
Economy and prepare an annual report by November 1 of each year. The
report shall be available on the Cabinet for Economic Development web page
as required by KRS 154.12-2035;
(d)[(c)] Oversee the modernization initiative in KRS 154.12-274;
(e)[(d)] Assist the cabinet in the recruitment of research and development
companies;
(f)[(e)] Assist the cabinet in the attraction of high-technology research and
development centers;
(g)[(f)] Support growth and creation of knowledge-based, innovative
Page 3 of 6
XXXX 11/6/2025 9:08 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 103
companies;
(h)[(g)] Build the infrastructure for innovative businesses and promote networks
of technology-driven clusters and research intensive industries;
(i)[(h)] Administer the high-tech construction pool and the high-tech investment
pool;
(j)[(i)] Recommend projects to the Kentucky Economic Development Finance
Authority for funding through the high-tech construction pool and high-tech
investment pool; and
(k)[(j)] Review and approve the annual plan which details the annual allocation
of funds from the Science and Technology Funding Program. As used in this
paragraph, the Science and Technology Funding Program means the
Kentucky enterprise fund, the Rural Innovation Program, the Kentucky
Commercialization Program, The Regional Technology
Corporations/Innovation and Commercialization Center Satellites, the
Experimental Program to Stimulate Competitive Research/Kentucky Science
and Engineering Foundation, Small Business Innovation Research and Small
Business Technology Transfer grants, and other government grant programs
and funding programs as determined by the executive director of the Office of
Entrepreneurship and Innovation.
(3) The high-tech construction pool shall be used for projects with a special emphasis
on the creation of high-technology jobs and knowledge-based companies. The
executive director, in administering the high-tech construction pool, shall
recommend distribution of funds and projects to the Kentucky Economic
Development Finance Authority for its approval. The executive director shall
recommend any designated amount of pool funds to be set aside for any match
requirements. Any funds used for matching purposes may include public and
private funds.
Page 4 of 6
XXXX 11/6/2025 9:08 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 103
(4) The high-tech investment pool shall be used to build and promote technology-
driven industries and research-intensive industries, as well as their related suppliers,
with the goal of creating clusters of innovation-driven industries in Kentucky. The
executive director, in administering the high-tech investment pool, shall be
authorized to recommend funds to be used to support loans and grants, or to secure
an equity or related position.
(5) The Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority shall ensure in their
approval of funding of projects that the highest priority is given to knowledge-based
companies in fulfillment of the purposes and intentions of the purposes of this
section.
Section 4. KRS 154.12-330 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority is hereby authorized to
develop and fund a small business loan program to assist new or existing small
businesses operating in the Commonwealth. The authority may lend up to one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to any eligible small business for acquisition,
construction, expansion, working capital, or any other business expense the
authority deems reasonable to approve.
(2) The authority shall determine the terms, conditions, and requirements for loans
issued under this section and Section 1 of this Act, including collateral
requirements when deemed reasonable and appropriate. Recognizing that small
businesses, while essential for the economic vitality of the Commonwealth, may
have difficulty obtaining conventional loans, the authority may provide terms that
are more lenient, high-risk, less secure, or otherwise less stringent than industry
standards.
(3) To be eligible for a loan under this section, a small business shall be engaged in
manufacturing, agribusiness, or service or technology, shall not be engaged
primarily in retail, and shall commit to creating and maintaining at least one (1)
Page 5 of 6
XXXX 11/6/2025 9:08 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 103
new full-time job above the number existing on the date of application.
(4) The authority shall make reasonable efforts to direct at least seven percent (7%)
of the small business loan program funds each year to Kentucky-based, veteran
entrepreneurs provided that the authority receives qualified applications
requesting at least seven percent (7%) of the small business loan program funds.
The authority shall develop the criteria to evaluate the applications giving a
preference to Kentucky-based companies as defined in KRS 164.6011 that:
(a) Were started by one (1) or more veteran entrepreneurs;
(b) Are veteran-owned businesses as defined in KRS 14A.1-070; or
(c) Employ veterans at a rate of no less than twenty-five percent (25%) of their
total employees.
Page 6 of 6
XXXX 11/6/2025 9:08 AM Jacketed